Arkansas, session 2025, SB447.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 3, Chapter 5, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 20 — Common Carrier Reporting Act.

3-5-2001. Title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Common Carrier
Reporting Act".

3-5-2002. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) "Alcoholic beverages" means intoxicating liquors of any kind
including without limitation beer, light wine, malt liquor, hard cider,
spirituous liquor, and vinous liquor as defined by Arkansas law;
(2) "Common carrier" means a common carrier by motor vehicle as
defined in § 23-13-203; and
*CRH167*
04-01-2025 13:05:03 CRH167

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB447
(3)(A) "Consumer" means an individual who orders alcoholic
beverages to be shipped to an individual or from whom spirits, wine, or beer
is ordered.
(B) "Consumer" does not include an individual who holds or
acts on behalf of a person that holds an alcoholic beverage license
authorizing the receipt of shipments for resale or production.

3-5-2003. Shipment reports.
(a)(1) Every quarter, a common carrier carrying a certificate of
public convenience and necessity under § 23-13-218 shall submit to the
Department of Finance and Administration a report containing the following
information related to shipments to a consumer:
(A) Name, business address, and registration
identification for the common carrier's certificate of public convenience and
necessity;
(B) Time period covered by the report required under this
section;
(C) Total weight of alcoholic beverage the common carrier
shipped to Arkansas addresses during the reporting period, categorized by
each type of alcoholic beverage;
(D) Dates of delivery for each delivery made during the
reporting period;
(E) Common carrier's parcel tracking number for the
shipment;
(F) Recipient's zip code; and
(G) Name and business address for each supplier or
manufacturer of each delivery.
(2) If no alcoholic beverages were shipped into Arkansas during
the reporting period by a common carrier, the common carrier shall submit a
report stating that no alcoholic beverages were shipped into Arkansas during
the reporting period.
(b) The department may require a common carrier filing a report under
this subchapter to submit additional information, including without
limitation business records, to substantiate information on the report.

3-5-2004. Penalties.
04-01-2025 13:05:03 CRH167

As Engrossed: S4/1/25 SB447
(a) The Department of Finance and Administration shall report to the
Arkansas Department of Transportation any common carrier that fails to submit
the reports required under § 3-5-2003 or the additional information required
by this subchapter.
(b) A common carrier that is reported under subsection (a) of this
section is subject to the penalties under § 23-13-234 for failure to report.

3-5-2005. Rules.
The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration may adopt
rules to implement this subchapter.

/s/J. Petty
























04-01-2025 13:05:03 CRH167